Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
201H

HAWAII
HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

201H-1 Definitions

201H-2 Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation;

establishment, staff

201H-3 Board; establishment, functions, duties

201H-4 General powers

201H-4.5 Urban gardening programs

201H-5 Fair housing law to apply

201H-6 Housing advocacy and information system

201H-7 Housing research

201H-8 Housing counseling

201H-9 Acquisition, use, and disposition of
property

201H-10 Cooperative agreements with other
governmental

agencies

201H-11 Agents, including corporations

201H-12 Development of property

201H-13 Eminent domain, exchange or use of public
property

201H-14 Contracts with the federal government

201H-15 Administration of low-income housing
credit allowed

under section 235-110.8

201H-16 Administration of federal programs

201H-17 Federal funds outside of state treasury

201H-18 Public works contracts

201H-19 Remedies of an obligee: mandamus;
injunction;

possessory action; receiver; accounting;
etc.

201H-20 Subordination of mortgage to agreement
with

government

201H-21 Duty to make reports

201H-22 Quitclaim deeds

201H-23 For-sale developments

Part II. Housing Development Programs

201H-31 Criteria

201H-32 Definitions

201H-33 Powers and duties, generally

201H-34 Additional powers; development

201H-34.5 Authority to modify and amend development

agreements with eligible developers

201H-35 Bond financing

201H-36 Exemption from general excise taxes

201H-37 Exemption from tax on income and
obligations

201H-38 Housing development; exemption from
statutes,

ordinances, charter provisions, and rules

201H-39 Starter homes; design standards;
applicant

eligibility; authority to incorporate
starter homes

into housing projects of the corporation

201H-40 Housing projects; construction and sponsorship

201H-41 Independent development of projects

201H-42 Private development of projects

201H-43 Interim financing of projects

201H-44 Commercial, industrial, and other uses

201H-45 Sale; mortgage, agreement of sale, and
other

instruments

201H-46 Co-mortgagor

201H-47 Real property; restrictions on transfer;
waiver of

restrictions

201H-48 Exception of current owners in
corporation projects

201H-49 Real property; restrictions on use

201H-50 Restrictions on use, sale, and transfer
of real

property; effect of amendment or repeal

201H-51 Corporation's right to repurchase or rent
real

property; authority to seek recovery

201H-52 Nonprofit organizations and government
agencies

201H-53 Rate of wages for laborers and mechanics

201H-57 Land leases to nonprofit organizations
providing

affordable housing

201H-58 Leases; self-help housing

201H‑59 Affordable rental housing
development program

201H-70 Additional powers

Part III. Financing Programs

A. General Provisions

201H-71 Bonds; authorization

201H-72 Issuance of bonds for the development of

infrastructure

201H-73 Issuance of bonds for the preservation of
low-income

housing projects

201H-74 Bonds; interest rate, price, and sale

201H-75 Trustee; designation, duties

201H-76 Trust indenture

201H-77 Investment of reserves, etc.

201H-78 Security for funds deposited by the
corporation

201H-79 Arbitrage provisions, interest rate

201H-80 Housing finance revolving fund; bond
revolving funds

201H-81 Repealed

201H-82 Rate of wages for laborers and mechanics

201H-85 Repealed

201H‑86 Low-income housing tax credit loan

201H-90 Additional powers

B. Housing Loan and Mortgage Program

201H-91 Definitions

201H-92 Owner-occupancy requirement

201H-93 Eligible borrowers

201H-94 Eligible loans

201H-95 Eligible project loans

201H-96 Eligible improvement loans

201H-97 Housing loan programs; procedures and
requirements

201H-98 Housing loan programs; general powers

201H-99 Housing loan programs; self-supporting

201H-100 Housing loan programs; fees

201H-101 Housing loan programs; evidence of
eligible loan,

eligible improvement loan, or eligible
project loan

201H-102 to 104 Repealed

201H-105 Advance commitments program

201H-106 Loan funding programs

201H-107 Loans; service and custody

201H-108 Loans; sale, pledge, or assignment

201H-109 Loans; insurance and guarantees

201H-110 Loans; default

201H-120 Additional powers

C. Rental Assistance Program

201H-121 Purpose; findings and determinations

201H-122 Definitions

201H-123 Rental assistance revolving fund

201H-124 Rental assistance contracts

201H-125 Rental assistance program

201H-126 Benefits of program not exclusive

201H-140 Additional powers

D. Taxable Mortgage Securities Programs

201H-141 Definitions

201H-142 Housing loan programs; authorization

201H-143 Housing loan programs; procedures and
requirements

201H-144 Housing loan programs; general powers

201H-150 Additional powers

E. State Mortgage Guarantee Program

201H-151 State mortgage guarantee

201H-152 Mortgage guarantee agreements

201H-160 Additional powers

F. Downpayment Loan Program

201H-161 Downpayment loans

201H-162 Qualifications for downpayment loans

201H-163 Restrictions on borrower

201H-164 Default

201H-170 Additional powers

G. Homebuyers' Club Program

201H-171 Homebuyers' club program

201H-180 Additional powers

H. Rent-to-Own Program

201H-181 Rent-to-own program

201H-190 Additional powers

I. Dwelling Unit Revolving Fund

201H-191 Dwelling unit revolving fund

201H-191.5 Regional state infrastructure subaccounts

201H-200 Additional powers

J. Rental Housing Revolving Fund

201H-201 Definitions

201H-202 Rental housing revolving fund

201H-203 Eligible applicants for funds

201H-204 Eligible projects

201H-210 Additional powers

Part IV. Expenditures of Revolving Funds
Under

the Corporation Exempt from
Appropriation

and Allotment

201H-211 Expenditures of revolving funds under the
corporation

exempt from appropriation and allotment

201H-220 Additional powers

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2006, c 180, §15.

Public land trust information system. L 2011, c 54; L 2013,
c 110.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Scramble to Protect the American Dream in Paradise: Is
Affordable Housing Possible in Hawaii? 10 HBJ 37 (2007).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next